Mississippi, session 2026, HB4180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Lasondra Bowling of Rankin County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of her conviction for the crime of Embezzlement on April 21, 2014, in Rankin County, for which she was sentenced to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections followed by five (5) years on probation. Previously, on November 26, 2012, she was sentenced to serve five (5) years on probation for the crime of Conspiracy to Commit a Crime in Rankin County.  On April 29, 2014, she was also sentenced for the crime of Conspiracy to Commit a Crime for which she was sentenced to serve two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections followed by three (3) years, nine (9) months and one (1) day on probation.  She was released to parole on December 7, 2015. She was released to probation on October 10, 2017, and was discharged from probation on May 26, 2020.  The Legislature is informed that she has since conducted herself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.